Hawaii statutes.
§339-3 Duties of the director. (a)
The director shall:

(1) Be responsible for the study of available
research in the field of litter control, prevention, removal, disposal, and
recycling; the study of methods for the implementation of such research; and
development of public educational programs;

(2) Serve as a coordinator between the State, state
agencies, and various organizations seeking to aid in the anti-litter effort;

(3) Cooperate with local governments to accomplish
the coordination of anti-litter efforts; and

(4) Encourage voluntary local anti-litter campaigns.

(b) The director may:

(1) Apply for funds or other resources available from
private or public sources;

(2) Conduct educational programs intended to instill
the anti-litter ethic;

(3) Design a state anti-litter symbol;

(4) Post anti-litter signs in public places where
required; and

(5) Design and make available a litter bag bearing
the state anti-litter symbol and a statement of the penalties prescribed herein
for littering. [L Sp 1977 1st, c 2, pt of §2; am L 1998, c 277, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next